Utah statutes.
4-31-119.   Disease control of poultry, waterfowl, and game-birds.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), the department may:

(a)  make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, that are necessary for the control and prevention of disease in poultry, waterfowl, and game-birds; and

(b)  enforce the rules described in Subsection (1)(a).

(2)  The department may not make a rule under Subsection (1)(a) that relates to protected wildlife that is:

(a)  living in nature; and

(b)  under the jurisdiction of the Division of Wildlife Resources.

